Utah statutes.
53-3-606.   Expenses of compact administrator.

The compact administrator provided for in Article VII of the compact is not entitled to any additional compensation on account of his service as administrator, but is entitled to expenses incurred in connection with his duties and responsibilities as administrator, in the same manner as for expenses incurred in connection with any other duties or responsibilities of his office or employment.

